Delaware, session 153, SB192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1.Â  Amend Subchapter I, Chapter 1, Title 26 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 102. Definitions. As used in this title, unless the context otherwise requires: ( ) âCall centerâ means a facility or other operation whereby a public utility receives incoming telephone calls, emails, or other electronic communication for the purpose of providing customer assistance or other service. ( ) âDisasterâ means as defined in Chapter 31 of Title 20. Section 2.Â  Amend Subchapter II, Chapter 1, Title 26 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 226.Â Call Centers (a) Not fewer than 120 days before relocating a call center outside of the service territory of the public utility or contracting call center work outside of the service territory of the public utility, a public utility must, in the manner and form determined by the Commission, do all of the following: (1) Notify the Commission of the public utilityâs intent to relocate the call center or contracting call center work outside of the service territory of the public utility. (2) Notify all current and prospective employees of the call center of the public utilityâs intent to relocate the call center or contracting call center work outside of the service territory of the public utility. (3) Notify the leadership of any of labor unions in which a current or prospective employee is a member of the public utilityâs intent to relocate the call center or contracting call center work outside of the service territory of the public utility. (b) A public utility is exempt from the notification requirements described in this section if the public utility contracts call center work outside of the service territory of the public utility due to a disaster.